Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3201.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 371 of Title 57, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Pardon and Parole Board is hereby authorized to
establish a Conviction Integrity Review Unit for the purpose of
reviewing convictions of those inmates who have received death
sentences.

Req. No. 14803 Page 1

B. The Pardon and Parole Board shall employ and fix the duties
and compensation of not less than two attorneys, who shall be
licensed to practice law in this state and who shall have experience
in either prosecuting criminal cases or providing criminal defense
representation to defendants in criminal cases. The Pardon and
Parole Board shall also employ and fix the duties and compensation
of an investigator, who shall be certified by the Council on Law
Enforcement Education and Training, and a paralegal. The attorneys,
investigator, and paralegal hired by the Board shall not be a
current employee of the Office of the Attorney General or the office
of any district attorney in this state.
C. Any inmate who has received a sentence of death in this
state shall be authorized to submit a petition to the Conviction
Integrity Review Unit requesting the review of his or her
conviction. The Pardon and Parole Board shall determine the manner
and form of the petition.
D. The Conviction Integrity Review Unit shall be authorized to
review any capital murder conviction that occurred within this state
under the following circumstances:
1. The inmate received a sentence of death;
2. The inmate has presented in his or her petition for review a
plausible claim of actual innocence of the crime which is:
a. supported by information or evidence not previously
presented, and
Req. No. 14803 Page 2

b. capable of being investigated and resolved; and
3. The direct appeal of the inmate has become final, a mandate
has been issued, and there is no pending litigation relating to the
conviction.
E. The Conviction Integrity Review Unit shall also be
authorized to initiate an investigation to determine whether an
inmate was convicted of an offense that he or she did not commit.
F. Once an investigation has been completed by the Conviction
Integrity Review Unit, the Unit shall present a report with its
findings and recommendations to the Pardon and Parole Board. Copies
of the report shall be delivered to the Attorney General, the office
of the district attorney who prosecuted the criminal case, the
attorney who represented the inmate in the criminal case, and the
inmate.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-14803 GRS 12/30/25







Req. No. 14803 Page 3